Wyoming, session 2025, SF0052.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 26-1-102(a)(xxxix), 26-3-106(b),
26-3-108(a)(intro), 26-3-112(a)(intro), 26-3-114(d) and by
creating a new subsection (e), 26-3-122(c), 26-9-216(a) and
(b), 26-24-109(b)(intro), 26-24-110(a)(intro), 26-24-113,
26-29-210(e) and 26-35-201 are amended to read:
26-1-102. Definitions.
(a) As used in this act:
(xxxix) "Insurance transaction" means:
(A) For the purposes of paragraph (xxxviii)
of this subsection, means any transaction involving
insurance primarily for personal, family or household needs
rather than business or professional needs and which
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
entails the determination of an individual's eligibility
for an insurance coverage, benefit or payment or the
servicing of an insurance application, policy, contract or
certificate;
(B) For all other purposes except as
provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, any
transaction involving insurance, including any act
specified in paragraph (xxx) of this subsection.
26-3-106. Conflict of names prohibited.
(b) In case of conflict of names between two (2)
insurers, or a conflict otherwise prohibited under this
section, the commissioner may permit, or shall require as a
condition to the issuance of an original a certificate of
authority to an applicant insurer, the insurer to use in
this state a modified name as may reasonably be necessary
to avoid the conflict.
26-3-108. Capital and surplus requirements.
(a) To qualify for authority to transact any kind of
insurance as defined in chapter 5 or combination of kinds
of insurance as specified in this subsection, a foreign
insurer, or a domestic stock insurer applying for its
original certificate of authority, shall possess and
thereafter maintain unimpaired basic paid-in capital stock
and surplus, if a stock insurer, or unimpaired basic
surplus, if a foreign mutual insurer or foreign reciprocal
insurer, in an amount not less than as follows:
26-3-112. Certificate of authority; application;
contents of application.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) An insurer shall apply to the commissioner for an
original a certificate of authority, stating under oath of
the president, or vice-president or other chief officer and
the secretary of the insurer, or of the attorney-in-fact if
the insurer is a reciprocal insurer, the insurer's name,
location of its home office, or principal office in the
United States if an alien insurer, the kinds of insurance
to be transacted, date of organization or incorporation,
form of organization, state or country of domicile and any
additional information the commissioner reasonably
requires. The application shall be accompanied by the
applicable fees as provided in W.S. 26-4-101 together with
the following documents, as applicable:
26-3-114. Certificate of authority; continuation;
expiration; reinstatement.
(d) If an insurer fails to renew its certificate of
authority within the time specified in subsection (c) of
this section, another certificate shall be issued only
after all requirements for an original a certificate of
authority in this state are fulfilled.
(e) All insurers or persons otherwise licensed or
registered under this article shall inform the commissioner
by any means acceptable to the commissioner, or as
specified by rule and regulation of the commissioner, of
any change of address, telephone number, email address or
other contact information that is on file with the
department within thirty (30) days of the change.
26-3-122. Service of process; service generally.
(c) Upon service the commissioner shall immediately
mail by registered certified mail one (1) of the copies of
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
the process to the person currently designated by the
insurer to receive the process as provided in W.S.
26-3-121(d).
26-9-216. Reporting of actions.
(a) A licensee shall report to the commissioner any
administrative action taken against the producer licensee
in another jurisdiction or by another governmental agency
in this state within thirty (30) days of the final
disposition of the matter. This report shall include a copy
of the order, consent to order or other relevant legal
documents.
(b) Within thirty (30) days of the initial pretrial
hearing date, a licensee shall report to the commissioner
any criminal prosecution of the producer licensee taken in
any jurisdiction. The report shall include a copy of the
initial complaint filed, the order resulting from the
hearing and any other relevant legal documents.
26-24-109. Initial requirements of domestic mutual
insurers; authorized transactions.
(b) When applying for an original a certificate of
authority, the insurer shall:
26-24-110. Bond or deposit required of domestic
mutual insurers.
(a) Before soliciting any applications for insurance
required under W.S. 26-24-109 as qualifications for the
original certificate of authority, the incorporators of the
proposed insurer shall file with the commissioner a
corporate surety bond in the penalty of fifteen thousand
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
dollars ($15,000.00), in favor of the state and for the use
and benefit of the state of the applicant members and
creditors of the corporation. The bond shall be conditioned
for:
26-24-113. Failure of domestic mutual insurer to
qualify.
If the proposed domestic insurer fails to complete its
organization and to secure its original certificate of
authority within one (1) year from the date of its
certificate of incorporation, its corporate powers cease,
and the commissioner shall return or cause to be returned
to the persons entitled thereto all advance deposits or
payments of premiums held in trust under W.S. 26-24-112.
26-29-210. Organization.
(e) The commissioner may make an examination and
require further information as he deems advisable. Upon
presentation of satisfactory evidence that the society has
complied with all the provisions of law, the commissioner
shall issue to the society a certificate of authority to
that effect and that the society is authorized to transact
business pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The
certificate of authority shall be prima facie evidence of
the existence of the society at the date of the
certificate. The commissioner shall cause a record of the
certificate of authority to be made. A certified copy of
the record may be given in evidence with like effect as the
original certificate of authority.
26-35-201. Scope of article.
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0052
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
This article applies to all property and casualty insurance
as defined in W.S. 26-5-104 and 26-5-106, except this
article does not apply to binders and other temporary
contracts for temporary insurance. provided for under W.S.
26-15-119 or personal lines auto policies.
Section 2. W.S. 26-3-113(c), 26-18-103(a)(ix) and (b)
and 26-19-107(a)(xvii) and (h) are repealed.
Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
6